Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [473.8591] METROPOLITAN URBAN SERVICE AREA EXPANSION PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Metropolitan Council is prohibited from expanding the Metropolitan Urban Service Area beyond the 2040 comprehensive plan depicted in the February 2024 Metropolitan Urban Service Area map. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end